src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ve Y 4450
SFX Ve ar o/G0 ar
SFX Ve ar o'l/G0 ar
SFX Ve ar as/G0 ar
SFX Ve ar es/G0 [^gczu]ar
SFX Ve uar ues/G0 [^g]uar
SFX Ve guar gües/G0 guar
SFX Ve gar gues/G0 gar
SFX Ve car ques/G0 car
SFX Ve zar ces/G0 zar
SFX Ve ar e/G1 [^gczu]ar
SFX Ve ar e'l/G1 [^gczu]ar
SFX Ve uar ue/G1 [^g]uar
SFX Ve uar ue'l/G1 [^g]uar
SFX Ve guar güe/G1 guar
SFX Ve guar güe'l/G1 guar
SFX Ve gar gue/G1 gar
SFX Ve gar gue'l/G1 gar
SFX Ve car que/G1 car
SFX Ve car que'l/G1 car
SFX Ve zar ce/G1 zar
SFX Ve zar ce'l/G1 zar
SFX Ve ar en/G1 [^gczu]ar
SFX Ve uar uen/G1 [^g]uar
SFX Ve guar güen/G1 guar
SFX Ve gar guen/G1 gar
SFX Ve car quen/G1 car
SFX Ve zar cen/G1 zar
SFX Ve ar an/G1 ar
SFX Ve er o/G0 [^ucü]er
SFX Ve er o'l/G0 [^ucü]er
SFX Ve er o/G0 [^qg]uer
SFX Ve er o'l/G0 [^qg]uer
SFX Ve quer co/G0 quer
SFX Ve quer co'l/G0 quer
SFX Ve guer go/G0 guer
SFX Ve guer go'l/G0 guer
SFX Ve cer zo/G0 cer
SFX Ve cer zo'l/G0 cer
SFX Ve üer uo/G0 üer
SFX Ve üer uo'l/G0 üer
SFX Ve er as/G0 [^ucü]er
SFX Ve er as/G0 [^qg]uer
SFX Ve quer cas/G0 quer
SFX Ve guer gas/G0 guer
SFX Ve cer zas/G0 cer
SFX Ve üer uas/G0 üer
SFX Ve er a/G1 [^ucü]er
SFX Ve er a'l/G1 [^ucü]er
SFX Ve er a/G1 [^qg]uer
SFX Ve er a'l/G1 [^qg]uer
SFX Ve quer ca/G1 quer
SFX Ve quer ca'l/G1 quer
SFX Ve guer ga/G1 guer
SFX Ve guer ga'l/G1 guer
SFX Ve cer za/G1 cer
SFX Ve cer za'l/G1 cer
SFX Ve üer ua/G1 üer
SFX Ve üer ua'l/G1 üer
SFX Ve er an/G1 [^ucü]er
SFX Ve er an/G1 [^qg]uer
SFX Ve quer can/G1 quer
SFX Ve guer gan/G1 guer
SFX Ve cer zan/G1 cer
SFX Ve üer uan/G1 üer
SFX Ve ir o/G0 [^ucü]ir
SFX Ve ir o'l/G0 [^ucü]ir
SFX Ve ir yo/G0 [^qg]uir
SFX Ve ir yo'l/G0 [^qg]uir
SFX Ve quir co/G0 quir
SFX Ve quir co'l/G0 quir
SFX Ve guir go/G0 guir
SFX Ve guir go'l/G0 guir
SFX Ve cir zo/G0 cir
SFX Ve cir zo'l/G0 cir
SFX Ve üir uo/G0 üir
SFX Ve üir uo'l/G0 üir
SFX Ve ir as/G0 [^ucü]ir
SFX Ve ir as/G0 [^qg]uir
SFX Ve quir cas/G0 quir
SFX Ve guir gas/G0 guir
SFX Ve cir zas/G0 cir
SFX Ve üir uas/G0 üir
SFX Ve ir a/G1 [^ucü]ir
SFX Ve ir a'l/G1 [^ucü]ir
SFX Ve ir a/G1 [^qg]uir
SFX Ve ir a'l/G1 [^qg]uir
SFX Ve quir ca/G1 quir
SFX Ve quir ca'l/G1 quir
SFX Ve guir ga/G1 guir
SFX Ve guir ga'l/G1 guir
SFX Ve cir za/G1 cir
SFX Ve cir za'l/G1 cir
SFX Ve üir ua/G1 üir
SFX Ve üir ua'l/G1 üir
SFX Ve ir an/G1 [^ucü]ir
SFX Ve ir an/G1 [^qg]uir
SFX Ve quir can/G1 quir
SFX Ve guir gan/G1 guir
SFX Ve cir zan/G1 cir
SFX Ve üir uan/G1 üir
SFX Ve abar ábo/XxV3V4 abar
SFX Ve abar ábes/XxV7V8 abar
SFX Ve abar ábas/XxV7V8 abar
SFX Ve abar ábe/XxV1V2V3V4 abar
SFX Ve abar áben/XxV1V2 abar
SFX Ve abar ában/XxV1V2 abar
SFX Ve aber ábo/XxV3V4 aber
SFX Ve aber ábas/XxV7V8 aber
SFX Ve aber ába/XxV1V2V3V4 aber
SFX Ve aber ában/XxV1V2 aber
SFX Ve abiar ábio/XxV3V4 abiar
SFX Ve abiar ábies/XxV7V8 abiar
SFX Ve abiar ábias/XxV7V8 abiar
SFX Ve abiar ábie/XxV1V2V3V4 abiar
SFX Ve abiar ábien/XxV1V2 abiar
SFX Ve abiar ábian/XxV1V2 abiar
SFX Ve abir ábo/XxV3V4 abir
SFX Ve abir ábas/XxV7V8 abir
SFX Ve abir ába/XxV1V2V3V4 abir
SFX Ve abir ában/XxV1V2 abir
SFX Ve ablar áblo/XxV3V4 ablar
SFX Ve ablar ábles/XxV7V8 ablar
SFX Ve ablar áblas/XxV7V8 ablar
SFX Ve ablar áble/XxV1V2V3V4 ablar
SFX Ve ablar áblen/XxV1V2 ablar
SFX Ve ablar áblan/XxV1V2 ablar
SFX Ve abrar ábro/XxV3V4 abrar
SFX Ve abrar ábres/XxV7V8 abrar
SFX Ve abrar ábras/XxV7V8 abrar
SFX Ve abrar ábre/XxV1V2V3V4 abrar
SFX Ve abrar ábren/XxV1V2 abrar
SFX Ve abrar ábran/XxV1V2 abrar
SFX Ve abriar ábrio/XxV3V4 abriar
SFX Ve abriar ábries/XxV7V8 abriar
SFX Ve abriar ábrias/XxV7V8 abriar
SFX Ve abriar ábrie/XxV1V2V3V4 abriar
SFX Ve abriar ábrien/XxV1V2 abriar
SFX Ve abriar ábrian/XxV1V2 abriar
SFX Ve abrir ábro/XxV3V4 abrir
SFX Ve abrir ábras/XxV7V8 abrir
SFX Ve abrir ábra/XxV1V2V3V4 abrir
SFX Ve abrir ábran/XxV1V2 abrir
SFX Ve acar áco/XxV3V4 acar
SFX Ve acar áques/XxV7V8 acar
SFX Ve acar ácas/XxV7V8 acar
SFX Ve acar áque/XxV1V2V3V4 acar
SFX Ve acar áquen/XxV1V2 acar
SFX Ve acar ácan/XxV1V2 acar
SFX Ve acer ázo/XxV3V4 acer
SFX Ve acer ázas/XxV7V8 acer
SFX Ve acer áza/XxV1V2V3V4 acer
SFX Ve acer ázan/XxV1V2 acer
SFX Ve achar ácho/XxV3V4 achar
SFX Ve achar áches/XxV7V8 achar
SFX Ve achar áchas/XxV7V8 achar
SFX Ve achar áche/XxV1V2V3V4 achar
SFX Ve achar áchen/XxV1V2 achar
SFX Ve achar áchan/XxV1V2 achar
SFX Ve aciar ácio/XxV3V4 aciar
SFX Ve aciar ácies/XxV7V8 aciar
SFX Ve aciar ácias/XxV7V8 aciar
SFX Ve aciar ácie/XxV1V2V3V4 aciar
SFX Ve aciar ácien/XxV1V2 aciar
SFX Ve aciar ácian/XxV1V2 aciar
SFX Ve acrar ácro/XxV3V4 acrar
SFX Ve acrar ácres/XxV7V8 acrar
SFX Ve acrar ácras/XxV7V8 acrar
SFX Ve acrar ácre/XxV1V2V3V4 acrar
SFX Ve acrar ácren/XxV1V2 acrar
SFX Ve acrar ácran/XxV1V2 acrar
SFX Ve actar ácto/XxV3V4 actar
SFX Ve actar áctes/XxV7V8 actar
SFX Ve actar áctas/XxV7V8 actar
SFX Ve actar ácte/XxV1V2V3V4 actar
SFX Ve actar ácten/XxV1V2 actar
SFX Ve actar áctan/XxV1V2 actar
SFX Ve actuar áctuo/XxV3V4 actuar
SFX Ve actuar áctuas/XxV7V8 actuar
SFX Ve actuar áctuan/XxV1V2 actuar
SFX Ve acuar ácuo/XxV3V4 acuar
SFX Ve acuar ácuas/XxV7V8 acuar
SFX Ve acuar ácuan/XxV1V2 acuar
SFX Ve adar ádo/XxV3V4 adar
SFX Ve adar ádes/XxV7V8 adar
SFX Ve adar ádas/XxV7V8 adar
SFX Ve adar áde/XxV1V2V3V4 adar
SFX Ve adar áden/XxV1V2 adar
SFX Ve adar ádan/XxV1V2 adar
SFX Ve ader ádo/XxV3V4 ader
SFX Ve ader ádas/XxV7V8 ader
SFX Ve ader áda/XxV1V2V3V4 ader
SFX Ve ader ádan/XxV1V2 ader
SFX Ve adiar ádio/XxV3V4 adiar
SFX Ve adiar ádies/XxV7V8 adiar
SFX Ve adiar ádias/XxV7V8 adiar
SFX Ve adiar ádie/XxV1V2V3V4 adiar
SFX Ve adiar ádien/XxV1V2 adiar
SFX Ve adiar ádian/XxV1V2 adiar
SFX Ve adir ádo/XxV3V4 adir
SFX Ve adir ádas/XxV7V8 adir
SFX Ve adir áda/XxV1V2V3V4 adir
SFX Ve adir ádan/XxV1V2 adir
SFX Ve adrar ádro/XxV3V4 adrar
SFX Ve adrar ádres/XxV7V8 adrar
SFX Ve adrar ádras/XxV7V8 adrar
SFX Ve adrar ádre/XxV1V2V3V4 adrar
SFX Ve adrar ádren/XxV1V2 adrar
SFX Ve adrar ádran/XxV1V2 adrar
SFX Ve adriar ádrio/XxV3V4 adriar
SFX Ve adriar ádries/XxV7V8 adriar
SFX Ve adriar ádrias/XxV7V8 adriar
SFX Ve adriar ádrie/XxV1V2V3V4 adriar
SFX Ve adriar ádrien/XxV1V2 adriar
SFX Ve adriar ádrian/XxV1V2 adriar
SFX Ve aduar áduo/XxV3V4 aduar
SFX Ve aduar áduas/XxV7V8 aduar
SFX Ve aduar áduan/XxV1V2 aduar
SFX Ve afar áfo/XxV3V4 afar
SFX Ve afar áfes/XxV7V8 afar
SFX Ve afar áfas/XxV7V8 afar
SFX Ve afar áfe/XxV1V2V3V4 afar
SFX Ve afar áfen/XxV1V2 afar
SFX Ve afar áfan/XxV1V2 afar
SFX Ve afiar áfio/XxV3V4 afiar
SFX Ve afiar áfies/XxV7V8 afiar
SFX Ve afiar áfias/XxV7V8 afiar
SFX Ve afiar áfie/XxV1V2V3V4 afiar
SFX Ve afiar áfien/XxV1V2 afiar
SFX Ve afiar áfian/XxV1V2 afiar
SFX Ve afrar áfro/XxV3V4 afrar
SFX Ve afrar áfres/XxV7V8 afrar
SFX Ve afrar áfras/XxV7V8 afrar
SFX Ve afrar áfre/XxV1V2V3V4 afrar
SFX Ve afrar áfren/XxV1V2 afrar
SFX Ve afrar áfran/XxV1V2 afrar
SFX Ve afriar áfrio/XxV3V4 afriar
SFX Ve afriar áfries/XxV7V8 afriar
SFX Ve afriar áfrias/XxV7V8 afriar
SFX Ve afriar áfrie/XxV1V2V3V4 afriar
SFX Ve afriar áfrien/XxV1V2 afriar
SFX Ve afriar áfrian/XxV1V2 afriar
SFX Ve agar ágo/XxV3V4 agar
SFX Ve agar águes/XxV7V8 agar
SFX Ve agar ágas/XxV7V8 agar
SFX Ve agar águe/XxV1V2V3V4 agar
SFX Ve agar águen/XxV1V2 agar
SFX Ve agar ágan/XxV1V2 agar
SFX Ve agrar ágro/XxV3V4 agrar
SFX Ve agrar ágres/XxV7V8 agrar
SFX Ve agrar ágras/XxV7V8 agrar
SFX Ve agrar ágre/XxV1V2V3V4 agrar
SFX Ve agrar ágren/XxV1V2 agrar
SFX Ve agrar ágran/XxV1V2 agrar
SFX Ve agriar ágrio/XxV3V4 agriar
SFX Ve agriar ágries/XxV7V8 agriar
SFX Ve agriar ágrias/XxV7V8 agriar
SFX Ve agriar ágrie/XxV1V2V3V4 agriar
SFX Ve agriar ágrien/XxV1V2 agriar
SFX Ve agriar ágrian/XxV1V2 agriar
SFX Ve aguar águo/XxV3V4 aguar
SFX Ve aguar ágües/XxV7V8 aguar
SFX Ve aguar águas/XxV7V8 aguar
SFX Ve aguar ágüe/XxV1V2V3V4 aguar
SFX Ve aguar ágüen/XxV1V2 aguar
SFX Ve aguar águan/XxV1V2 aguar
SFX Ve aguer ágo/XxV3V4 aguer
SFX Ve aguer ágas/XxV7V8 aguer
SFX Ve aguer ága/XxV1V2V3V4 aguer
SFX Ve aguer ágan/XxV1V2 aguer
SFX Ve aiguer áigo/XxV3V4 aiguer
SFX Ve aiguer áigas/XxV7V8 aiguer
SFX Ve aiguer áiga/XxV1V2V3V4 aiguer
SFX Ve aiguer áigan/XxV1V2 aiguer
SFX Ve ah.ar áh.o/XxV3V4 ah.ar
SFX Ve ah.ar áh.es/XxV7V8 ah.ar
