src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.dic
abatanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ablanquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abozar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aburrir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acandilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acastellanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
achaplar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acocar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aconfechar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acostaciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acuquellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
adivinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afarfullar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aformentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afuñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agobiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aguardar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aisllar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aleluyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allargar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allordacar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aludir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amarar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amazapiellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ameter/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amoriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amoyecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
anazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
animalizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apabiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apanguatar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apavoriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apelotonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apiadar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apipiolar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apolistronar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apotelar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
argamasiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrastrexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arremolinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrosicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asobiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atapurriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atiñazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atrever/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
averdecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
azamarrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
baillotiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
beber/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
brillar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
calaviar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
capacitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
catapultar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chapetiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chuchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
clocar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
comprar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
contestar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cosicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
curvar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
demochicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desacoxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desamoriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desasitiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desclasar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desempañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desengreñonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desfasar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desoreyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
determinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
doctorar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embargar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embromar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emparvar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emplastar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encaldiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encarruscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enclavar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
endañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enformar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engatuñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engurruñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enquillotrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ensandecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entesacar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entresemar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enxamar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbabuyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbocar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escaecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escantollar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escarriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escociar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escotapar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escuxurciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfondar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esgarduñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esguiñitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmaraviyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmuelguer/XxVe st:esmolgar
esparcer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espeluxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esplicitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esquitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estetar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estraperlar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esturruñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
falagar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
festeyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
forquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
fuyir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
gañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
guarar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
identificar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
instaurar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llamaricar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llibertar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
madrugar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
marciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mentalizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
morenar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
nasalizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
operar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pandiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pedar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
picalbiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
podrecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
presumir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
queper/XxVeVh st:caber
rapuñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rebozar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
recuperar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reguñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
renomar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rescañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
retozar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rimar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rungar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
segotiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sobrevenguer/XxVeVh st:sobrevenir
sopiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
supanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
taragañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tildar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trabar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trescurrir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trunfar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
valumbar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
voltoriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xiringar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
zaraciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
